California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 surveyor or engineer shall return it to the person who submitted it together with a written statement of the changes necessary to make it conform to the requirements of subdivision (a). The licensed land surveyor or licensed civil engineer submitting the corner record may then make the agreed changes in compliance with subdivision (a) and note those matters that cannot be agreed upon in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (c), and shall resubmit the corner record within 60 days, or within the time as may be mutually agreed upon by the licensed land surveyor or licensed civil engineer and the county surveyor, to the county surveyor for filing pursuant to subdivision (c). The county surveyor or engineer shall file the corner record within 10 working days after receipt of the resubmission.

(c) If the matters appearing on the corner record cannot be agreed upon by the licensed land surveyor or the licensed civil engineer and the county
 surveyor within 10 working days after the licensed land surveyor or licensed civil engineer resubmits and requests the corner record be filed without further change, an explanation of the differences shall be noted on the corner record and it shall be submitted to and filed by the county surveyor. The licensed land surveyor or licensed civil engineer filing the corner record shall attempt to reach agreement with the county surveyor regarding the language for the explanation of the differences. If they cannot agree on the language explaining the differences, then both shall add a notation on the corner record explaining the differences. The explanation of the differences shall be sufficiently specific to identify the factual basis for the differences.

(d) The corner record filed with the county surveyor of any county shall be securely fastened by him or her into a suitable book provided for that purpose.

(e) A charge for examining, indexing, and filing the corner record may be collected by the county surveyor, not to exceed the amount required for the recording of a deed.

(f) If the preparer of the corner record provides a postage-paid, self-addressed envelope or postcard with the filing of the corner record, the county surveyor shall return the postage-paid, self-addressed envelope or postcard to the preparer of the corner record with the filing data within 20 days of final filing. For the purposes of this subdivision, “filing data” includes the date, book or volume, and the page at which the corner record is filed by the county surveyor. This subdivision shall not apply to a county surveyor’s office that maintains an electronic database of filed corner records that is accessible to the public by reference to the preparer’s license number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8773.3.

In every case where a corner record is filed pursuant to Section 8773, the licensed land surveyor or registered civil engineer shall reconstruct or rehabilitate the monument of such corner, and accessories to such corner, so that the same shall be left by them in such physical condition that it remains as permanent a monument as is reasonably possible and so that the same may be reasonably expected to be located with facility at all times in the future.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 21.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8773.4.

(a) A corner record shall be signed by a licensed land surveyor or licensed civil engineer and stamped with his or her seal, or in the case of an agency of the United States government or the State of California, the certificate may be signed by the chief of the survey party making the survey, setting forth his or her official title, prior to filing.

(b) A corner record need not be filed when:

(1) A corner record
 is on file and the corner is found as described in the existing corner record.

(2) All conditions of Section 8773 are complied with by proper notations on a record of survey map filed in compliance with the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act or a parcel or subdivision map, in compliance with the Subdivision Map Act.

(3) When the survey is a survey of a mobilehome park interior lot as defined in Section 18210 of the Health and Safety Code, provided that no subdivision map, official map, or record of survey has been previously filed for the interior lot or no conversion to residential ownership has occurred pursuant to Section 66428.1 of the Government Code.

(c) This section shall not apply to maps filed prior to January 1, 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 607, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8774.

(a) The right of entry upon or to real property to investigate and utilize boundary evidence, and to perform surveys, is a right of persons legally authorized to practice land surveying, and it is the responsibility of the owner or tenant who owns or controls property to provide reasonable access without undue delay. The right of entry is not contingent upon the provision of prior notice to the owner or tenant. However, the owner or tenant shall be notified of the proposed time of entry where practicable.

(b) The requirements of subdivision (a) do not apply to monuments
 within access-controlled portions of freeways.

(c) When required for a property survey, monuments within a freeway right-of-way shall be referenced to usable points outside the access control line by the agency having jurisdiction over the freeway when requested in writing by the registered civil engineer or licensed land surveyor who is to perform the property survey. The work shall be done within a reasonable time period by the agency in direct cooperation with the engineer or surveyor and at no charge to him or her.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 805, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8774.5.

(a) Upon the filing of a record of survey, amended record of survey, or certificate of correction for recordation pursuant to this chapter, the surveyor or engineer who prepared the document shall transmit a copy of the document, including all recording information, to the county surveyor, who shall maintain an index, by geographic location, of the documents. 

(b) The county surveyor may charge a fee equal to the fee charged for recording the documents specified in subdivision (a), for purposes of financing the costs of maintaining the index of those documents. 

(c) The requirements of this section shall not apply to any county which requires the documents specified in subdivision (a) to be transmitted to the county surveyor and requires that official to maintain an index of those documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Photogrammetry [8775. - 8775.3.]

8775.

No person shall use the title or any abbreviation of the title photogrammetrist or photogrammetric surveyor unless he or she holds registration as a civil engineer or licensed land surveyor, or unless he or she is licensed as a photogrammetric surveyor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8775.1.

Persons meeting the requirements of this article may engage in and perform all photogrammetric services germane to this chapter, either as individuals, employees, or as independent contractors; provided, however, that the field surveys to be done are performed by registered civil engineers or licensed land surveyors, and in the preparation of any topographic map which contains the delineation of property corners or a property boundary or boundaries the work is certified or attested to by a registered civil engineer or land surveyor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

8775.2.

Maps, documents, or reports prepared by, or under the direction of, a licensed photogrammetric surveyor shall carry his signature and certificate number which will indicate his responsibility for the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

8775.3.

Photogrammetric surveyor licenses shall be renewable upon payment of the fee fixed by the board for which a renewal certificate shall be issued. Photogrammetric surveyor license fees shall be the same as those prescribed for land surveyor’s licensing; and the provisions of this chapter relating to revenue, and with respect to disciplinary proceedings, shall similarly apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 108.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.7. Reporting Requirements [8776. - 8776.7.]

8776.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board in writing the occurrence of any of the following events that occurred on or after January 1, 2008, within 90 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of the event:

(1) The conviction of the licensee of any felony.

(2) The conviction of the licensee of any other crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensed land surveyor.

(3) A civil action settlement or administrative action resulting in a settlement against the licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, breach or violation of
 contract, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of land surveying if the amount or value of the settlement is greater than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(4) A civil action judgment or binding arbitration award, or administrative action resulting in a judgment or binding arbitration award, against the licensee in any action alleging fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, breach or violation of contract, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensee in the practice of land surveying if the amount or value of the judgment or binding arbitration award is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or greater.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be signed by the licensee and set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, the report shall
 set forth the title of the matter, court or agency name, docket number, and the dates the reportable event occurred.

(c) A licensee shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable events, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with license renewal.

(d) Nothing in this section shall impose a duty upon any licensee to report to the board the occurrence of any of the events set forth in subdivision (a) either by or against any other licensee.

(e) Failure of a licensee to report to the board in the time and manner required by this section shall be grounds for disciplinary action.

(f) For purposes of this section, a conviction includes the initial plea, verdict, or finding of guilt; a plea of no
 contest; or pronouncement of sentence by a trial court even though the conviction may not be final or sentence actually imposed until all appeals are exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 9.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.1.

Within 30 days of entry of a conviction described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8776, a settlement described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 8776, or a judgment described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 8776, by a court of this state that has been notified that the defendant is a licensee of the board, the court that rendered the conviction or judgment shall report that fact to the board and provide the board with a copy of the conviction, settlement, or judgment and any orders or opinions of the court accompanying or ordering the conviction, settlement, or
 judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 471, Sec. 5.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.2.

(a) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award described in Section 8776 against a licensee of the board, any insurer providing professional liability insurance to that licensee shall report to the board the name of the licensee; the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award; the amount paid by the insurer; and the identity of the payee.

(b) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award described in Section 8776 against a licensee of the board, any state or local government agency that self-insures that licensee shall report to the board the name of the licensee; the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or binding arbitration award; the amount paid; and the identity of the payee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 471, Sec. 6.   (SB 679)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.3.

The requirements of Sections 8776, 8776.1, and 8776.2 shall apply if a party to the civil action, settlement, or arbitration award is or was a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, or state or local government agency in which the licensee is or was an owner, partner, member, officer, or employee and is or was the licensee in responsible charge of that portion of the project that was the subject of the civil judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 8776.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensee shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement by providing a report to the board as required by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 8776.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.5.

The provisions of this article apply to a civil engineer licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) prior to January 1, 1982, if the civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award relates to the practice of professional land surveying.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 8776.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.6.

The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements of Sections 8776, 8776.1, and 8776.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section conditionally operative on January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 8776.7.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.7.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2008, only if an appropriation is made from the Professional Engineer’s and Land Surveyor’s Fund for the 2007–08 fiscal year in the annual Budget Act to fund the activities of this article, and sufficient hiring authority is granted to the board pursuant to a budget change proposal to provide sufficient staffing to implement this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section prescribes a conditional operative date for Article 5.7, commencing with Section 8776.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Disciplinary Proceedings [8780. - 8785.]

8780.

(a) The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any land surveyor licensed under this chapter or any civil engineer licensed under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) who is legally authorized to practice land surveying and make findings thereon.

(b) By a majority vote, the board may publicly reprove, suspend for a period not to exceed two years, or revoke the license or certificate of any land surveyor licensed under this chapter or civil engineer licensed under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) who is legally authorized to practice land surveying on any of the following grounds:

(1) Any fraud,
 deceit, or misrepresentation in their practice of land surveying.

(2) Any negligence in their practice of land surveying.

(3) Any incompetence in their practice of land surveying. 

(4) Any fraud or deceit in obtaining their license.

(5) Any violation of any provision of this chapter or of any other law relating to or involving the practice of land surveying.

(6) Any conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a land surveyor. The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(7) Aiding or abetting any person in the violation of any provision of this chapter or
 any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(8) A breach or violation of a contract to provide land surveying services.

(9) A violation in the course of the practice of land surveying of a rule or regulation of unprofessional conduct adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 106, Sec. 3.   (SB 414)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.1.

The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any land surveyor-in-training and make findings thereon.

By a majority vote, the board may revoke the certificate of any land surveyor-in-training:

(a) Who has been convicted of a crime as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 480.

(b) Who has committed any act that would be grounds for denial of a license pursuant to Section 480 or 496.

(c) Who has committed any act of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining his or her land
 surveyor-in-training certificate or license as a professional land surveyor.

(d) Who aids or abets any person in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Who violates Section 119 with respect to a land surveyor-in-training certificate.

(f) Who commits any act described in Section 8792.

(g) Who violates any provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 32.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.2.

The failure of, or refusal by, a licensee or a certificate holder to respond to a written request from a representative of the board in the investigation of a complaint against that licensee or certificate holder constitutes a cause for disciplinary action under Section 8780 or 8780.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 14.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8781.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8783.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a land surveyor is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license or certificate suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or certificate, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

8784.

The board may reissue a license to any person, whose license has been revoked, if a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of such reinstatement, for reasons the board may deem sufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1028.)
-------------------------------------------

8785.

(a) A petitioner may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including reduction, modification, or termination of probation, after the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering the disciplinary action, or if the order of the board or any portion of it is stayed by a court of law, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for reinstatement of a license or certificate that was revoked or surrendered. However, the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order of revocation or surrender a lesser period of time that shall be at minimum one year.

(2) At least two years for early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for early termination of a probation period of less than three years.

(4) At least one year for reduction or modification of a condition of probation.

(b) The board shall notify the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and the petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given the opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The board itself or an administrative law judge, if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(d) The board may grant or deny the petition or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction or modification of the penalty.

(e) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(f) The board may, in its discretion, deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Judicial review of the board’s decision following a hearing under this section may be sought by way of a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The party seeking to overturn the board’s decision shall have the burden of proof in any mandamus proceeding. In the mandamus proceeding, if it is alleged that there has been an abuse of discretion because the board’s findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(h) For the purposes of this section, “petitioner” means a professional land surveyor or licensed civil engineer or a land surveyor-in-training whose license or certificate has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered or placed on probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 691, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Offenses Against the Chapter [8790. - 8792.]

8790.

The board shall enforce all of the provisions of this chapter and cause the prosecution of all violations coming to its notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

8790.5.

(a) If a licensee who is retained as an expert witness enters into a nondisclosure agreement, that agreement shall not be construed to prevent the licensee from reporting a potential violation of the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act to the board.

(b) This section shall not be construed to be, or act as, a waiver of any applicable attorney-client or attorney work product privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 145, Sec. 3.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8791.

It is the duty of the respective officers charged with the enforcement of laws to prosecute all persons charged with the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

8792.

A person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(a) Unless the person is exempt from licensure under this chapter, practices, or offers to practice, land surveying in this state without legal authorization.

(b) Presents as their own the certificate of a land surveyor-in-training or the license of a professional land surveyor unless they are the person named on the certificate or the license.

(c) Attempts to file as their own any record of survey under the license of a professional land surveyor.

(d) Gives false evidence of any kind to the board, or to any board member, in
 obtaining a certificate or a license.

(e) Impersonates or uses the seal, signature, or license number of a professional land surveyor or who uses a false license number.

(f) Impersonates or uses the certificate number of a land surveyor-in-training or who uses a false certificate.

(g) Uses an expired, suspended, surrendered, or revoked certificate or license.

(h) Represents themselves as, or uses the title of, professional land surveyor, or any other title whereby that person could be considered as practicing or offering to practice land surveying, unless the person is correspondingly qualified by licensure as a land surveyor under this chapter.

(i) Uses the title, or any combination of
 that title, of “professional land surveyor,” “licensed land surveyor,” “land surveyor,” or the titles specified in Sections 8751 and 8775, or “land surveyor-in-training,” or who makes use of any abbreviation of that title that might lead to the belief that the person is a licensed land surveyor or holds a certificate as a land surveyor-in-training, without being licensed or certified as required by this chapter.

(j) Unless appropriately licensed, manages, or conducts as manager, proprietor, or agent, any place of business from which land surveying work is solicited, performed, or practiced, except as authorized pursuant to Section 6731.2.

(k) Violates any provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 22.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Revenue [8800. - 8805.]

8800.

(a) The department shall receive and account for all money derived under the operation of this chapter and, at the end of each month, shall report such money to the Controller and shall pay it to the Treasurer, who shall keep the money in a separate fund known as the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund.

(b) For accounting and recordkeeping purposes, the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund shall be deemed to be a single special fund, and shall be available for expenditure only for the purposes as are now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(c) The fees and civil penalties received under
 this chapter shall be deposited in the Professional Engineer’s, Land Surveyor’s, and Geologist’s Fund. All moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 27) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 428, Sec. 28.   (AB 177)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

Licenses issued under this chapter expire every two years, if not renewed. Biennial renewals shall be staggered on a quarterly basis. To renew an unexpired license the licenseholder shall on or before the date of expiration indicated on the renewal receipt, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 495, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.1.

(a) At the time of renewal specified in Section 8801 or 8802, the board shall administer an assessment of the licenseholder to reinforce the licenseholder’s knowledge of state laws and the board’s rules and regulations. Failure to complete this assessment within 60 days after the date of expiration of the license may result in disciplinary action under Section 8780, but shall not affect
 the renewal of the license.

(b) The crime in subdivision (j) of Section 8792 shall not apply to this section.

(c) The board shall not charge the licenseholder a fee for the administration or development of the assessment.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “assessment” means an online program that contains educational reading material and questions. The material shall be based on state law and the board’s rules and regulations relating to the practice of professional land surveyors. The scope of the assessment shall be limited to the board’s
 top five types of violations related to the administrative and procedural aspects of the practice of professional land surveyors and any changes or additions to existing law related to such administrative and procedural aspects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, licenses issued under this chapter may be renewed at any time within five years after expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 8801 which next
 occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 31.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.1.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1257.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.2.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1257.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

(a) A license that is not renewed within five years after its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated. After five years after expiration, the holder of a license may apply for and obtain a new license subject to the following:

(1) He or she has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) He or she takes and passes the examination, if any, that would be required if applying for the license for the first time.

(b) The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver or refund
 of all or any part of the application fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 32.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.1.

Once an expired or delinquent license is renewed pursuant to Section 8802, all of the following apply:

(a) The board shall continue to have full jurisdiction and authority over the licensee as if the license had not expired or become delinquent.

(b) The work performed by the licensee during a period of expiration or delinquency shall be deemed lawful and validly performed as to persons or entities other than the licensee.

(c) The renewal of a license shall not affect liability issues regarding work performed during a period of expiration or delinquency, nor does the fact of
 performance during a period of expiration or delinquency affect liability issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 33.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

The renewal or reinstatement of any certificate of registration of a civil engineer under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3, who is also a licensed land surveyor, shall not include the renewal or restoration of his land surveyor’s license, without the payment of the surveyor’s renewal fee or penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.5.

The board may make refunds of all fees in accordance with Section 158 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1200, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter shall be fixed by the board in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The fee for filing each application for licensure as a land surveyor at not more than four hundred dollars ($400) and for each application for certification as a land surveyor-in-training (LSIT) at not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The fees to take an examination administered by a public or private organization pursuant to Section 8745 shall be no greater than the actual cost of the development and administration of the examination and may be paid directly to the organization by the applicant.

(c) The renewal fee for a land surveyor at not more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(d) The fee for a retired license at not more than 50 percent of the professional land surveyor application fee in effect on the date of application.

(e) The delinquency fee at not more than 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of reinstatement.

(f) The board shall establish by regulation an appeal fee for examination. The regulation shall include provisions for an applicant to be reimbursed the appeal fee if the appeal results in passage of examination. The fee shall be no more than the costs incurred by the board.

(g) All other document fees are to be set by the board by rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 34.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19.5. Aircraft Repair [9790. - 9798.4.]

9790.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) To the extent applicable, the definitions which are now or may hereafter be set forth in Section 1301 of Title 49 of the United States Code are incorporated herein by reference.

(b) To the extent applicable, the definitions which are now or may hereafter be set forth in Sections 1.1, and 1.2 of Part 1 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, are incorporated herein by reference.

(c) To the extent applicable, the definitions which are now or may hereafter be set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1201) of Division 1 of the Commercial Code are incorporated herein by reference.

(d) “General aviation” means all aviation with the exception of air carrier and military aviation.

(e) “Repairperson” means any person engaged in the business of repairing general aviation aircraft.

(f) “Customer” means any person who requests a repairperson to do work on a general aviation aircraft which is in the possession of that person.

(g) “Certificated repair station” means a person or business entity which is the duly authorized holder of a Federal Aviation Administration certificated repair station designation pursuant to the provisions of Part 145 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A certificated repair station is a subcategory of a “repairperson.”

(h) “Certificated mechanic” means an individual person who is the duly authorized holder of a Federal Aviation Administration Mechanic Certificate, with either an “Airframe,” a “Powerplant,” or an “Inspection Authorization” rating, which has been issued to that person pursuant to the provisions of Part 65 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A certificated mechanic is a subcategory of a “repairperson.”

(i) “Fixed base operator” means a person or business entity which is the duly authorized holder of a business license issued by all applicable state or local governmental entities, to engage in the business of providing fuel, oil, storage, parking, cleaning, and other products and services for use in general aviation aircraft, or by customers utilizing general aviation aircraft. A fixed-base operator is a subcategory of a “repairperson.”

(j) A “noncertificated repairperson” means a repairperson that is not a certificated repair station, a certificated mechanic, nor a fixed-base operator. A noncertificated repairperson is a subcategory of a “repairperson.”

(k) The “FAA Aircraft Registry” means that particular system for the recording of conveyances and other documents which affect the title to, or any interest in, civil aircraft of the United States, which was originally created pursuant to Section 503 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958 as set forth in Section 1403 of Title 49 of the United States Code and which is more specifically identified in Section 49.11 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations as:

FAA Aircraft Registry
Department of Transportation
P.O. Box 25504
Oklahoma City, OK 73125
or delivered to the Registry at:
 6500 South MacArthur Boulevard
Oklahoma City, OK 73169

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9791.

This chapter applies only to work done on a general aviation aircraft with either an estimated cost or an actual cost of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1001, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9792.
